Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 31 State Colleges [Repealed.]

16-31-1 — 16-31-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935; ch. 2250, § 84; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; P.L. 1939, ch. 688, §§ 1-11; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 20; P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 20; P.L. 1956, ch. 3696, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-31-1

—

16-31-1

5; impl. am. P.L. 1959, ch. 44, § 3; P.L. 1966, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 181, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 174, art. VIII, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 84, §§ 52 and 121, effective May 27, 1988.